Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.775

Risk management—Enforcement of bonds under RCW 39.59.010.

The director, through the office of risk management, shall receive and enforce bonds posted pursuant to *RCW 39.59.010 (3) and (4).

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 505; 2002 c 332 s 8; 1988 c 281 s 6. Formerly RCW 43.41.330, 43.19.19367.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 39.59.010 was amended by 2016 c 152 s 9, deleting subsections (3) and (4).

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.